Utah statutes.
53-11-111.   Licensure -- Bail recovery agent -- Requirements and
limitations.
(1) (a)  In addition to the requirements in Sections 53-11-108 and 53-11-113,
an applicant for licensure as a bail recovery agent shall meet all of the
requirements under Section 53-11-109, but instead of the experience
requirement under Subsection 53-11-109(1)(a), a bail recovery agent applicant
shall have a minimum of 1,000 hours of experience consisting of either actual
bail recovery work, or work as a law enforcement officer for a federal, state,
or local governmental agency.
(b)  The applicant shall substantiate the experience claimed under Subsection
(1) as qualifying experience and shall provide:
(i)  the exact details as to the character and nature of the experience on a
form prescribed by the department; and
(ii)  certification by the applicant's employers, which is subject to
independent verification by the board.
(c)  If an applicant is unable to supply written certification of experience
from an employer in whole or in part, an applicant may offer written
certification from persons other than an employer covering the same subject
matter for consideration by the board.
(d)  The burden of proving completion of the required experience is on the
applicant.
(2)  An applicant for license renewal shall have completed not less than eight
hours of continuing classroom instruction.
(3)  A bail recovery agent may work as a licensee under this chapter only as
an employee of or as an independent contractor with a bail bond agency.  A
bail recovery agent may not:
(a)  advertise his services;
(b)  provide services as a licensee under this chapter directly for members of
the public; or
(c)  employ or hire as independent contractors bail enforcement agents, bail
recovery agents, or bail recovery apprentices.
